Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3504
Articles of association; notice; contents; hearing.

(1) Immediately after the articles of association and request for approval have been filed, as provided for by subsection (4) of section 18-3503, the clerk of the city or village where the articles are filed shall schedule a hearing to be held within ninety days after the date of such filing by the city council or village board of trustees regarding formation of the proposed community improvement district and any objections to such formation.

(2) The city or village clerk shall publish a notice of association in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or village and in the proposed community improvement district in one publication at least sixty days prior to the date of such hearing and in the four weekly publications of such newspaper immediately preceding the date set for such hearing, which notice shall set forth the following:

(a) That the articles of association have been filed in the office of the city or village clerk and are available for inspection and the purpose thereof;

(b) The date and time of the hearing scheduled regarding formation of the proposed community improvement district and any objections thereto and that any written objections regarding such community improvement district shall be filed with the city or village clerk at least seven calendar days prior to the date of such hearing;

(c) A description of the real estate proposed to be included in the community improvement district and that the owner or owners of such real estate will be affected by formation of such community improvement district and rendered liable to taxation and special assessment in accordance with law and in addition to any other taxes or assessments of the city or village and other existing taxing entities, for the purpose of construction, installation, improvement, equipping, maintenance, and repair of public infrastructure in or related to such community improvement district, and contracting with the city or village in which the community improvement district is located or other political subdivisions of this state for any public purpose;

(d) The names of the proposed trustees;

(e) The proposed aggregate maximum permitted levy rate for all purposes, stated as an amount not to exceed ......... per $100 of taxable valuation in such community improvement district, to be deposited and held in the funds of the community improvement district and used for general corporate purposes, including payment of principal of and interest on any outstanding bonds, warrants, and other obligations of the community improvement district; and

(f) That application has been made to the city or village to declare to the district a community improvement district pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act.

(3) The city or village clerk shall mail a copy of such notice of association to the several owners of real estate in the proposed community improvement district who have not signed the articles of association. The notice shall be sent via certified mail service to the last-known address of each such owner no later than ten days after publishing the first notice of association, with a return receipt requested showing to whom and where the notice was delivered and the date of delivery.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 4.
April 17, 2026